District of Columbia statutes.
46-301.02

Tribunal of the District.

The Family Division is the tribunal of the District.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 102, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-341.2.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 103 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).